Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-506
Presiding judge; selection; departments.

In districts with more than one judge of the county court, the judges shall annually select one of their number as presiding judge and may establish such departments within the court as they deem necessary for determining particular classes of cases.

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 6;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 8.

Small Claims Department, see section 25-2801.